Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 13. SPORTS, AMUSEMENTS, AND ENTERTAINMENT

SUBTITLE A-1. TEXAS RACING ACT

CHAPTER 2030. TEXAS-BRED HORSES AND GREYHOUNDS

SUBCHAPTER A. TEXAS-BRED HORSES; BREED REGISTRIES; RACING

Sec. 2030.001. QUALIFICATIONS OF ACCREDITED TEXAS-BRED HORSES. (a) Subject to this subtitle or commission rule, a state horse breed registry shall adopt reasonable rules to establish the qualifications of accredited Texas-bred horses to promote, develop, and improve the breeding of horses in this state.

(b) Rules adopted under this section are subject to approval by the commission.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.002. STATE HORSE BREED REGISTRIES. (a) The officially designated state horse breed registries for accredited Texas-bred horses are:

(1) the Texas Thoroughbred Breeders Association for Thoroughbred horses;

(2) the Texas Quarter Horse Association for quarter horses;

(3) the Texas Appaloosa Horse Club for Appaloosa horses;

(4) the Texas Arabian Breeders Association for Arabian horses; and

(5) the Texas Paint Horse Breeders Association for paint horses.

(b) The appropriate state horse breed registry shall act in an advisory capacity to each racetrack association and to the commission for the purpose of administering Sections 2030.003 and 2030.004.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.003. TEXAS-BRED RACES. (a) In this section, "Texas-bred race" means a race limited to accredited Texas-bred horses.

(b) A racetrack association shall provide for the running of Texas-bred races.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), on each horse racing day, a racetrack association shall provide for the running of at least two Texas-bred races, including one race restricted to maidens.

(d) In accordance with commission rule, a racetrack association may defer the running of one or both of the races required by Subsection (c) for each horse racing day if the racetrack association provides that the total number of accredited Texas-bred races in a horse race meeting is equal to twice the total number of horse racing days in the horse race meeting.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.004. PURSE SUPPLEMENTS FOR TEXAS-BRED RACES. (a) In this section, "Texas-bred race" has the meaning assigned by Section 2030.003.

(b) To encourage horse breeding in this state, an accredited Texas-bred horse finishing first, second, or third in a race in this state, except a restricted stakes race, is entitled to receive a purse supplement.

(c) Funds for the purse supplements shall be derived from the breakage as provided by Subchapters C and E, Chapter 2028.

(d) An accredited Texas-bred Thoroughbred horse that finishes first, second, or third in a race other than a Texas-bred race is entitled to receive an owner's bonus award as a purse supplement. Twenty-five percent of the Texas-bred program funds received under Subchapters C and E, Chapter 2028, excluding expenses for administration of the Texas-bred program, shall be allocated to fund the bonus awards.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.005. EQUITABLE NUMBER OF RACES FOR EACH BREED. (a) A racetrack association that conducts a horse race meeting for more than one breed of horse at one racetrack shall provide that the number of races run by each breed on each day is equitable as determined by the commission under Section 2029.003.

(b) The commission by rule or by order may allow an exception to Subsection (a) if an insufficient number of horses of a breed are available to provide sufficient competition.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.006. EQUITABLE STABLING. A racetrack association that conducts a horse race meeting for more than one breed of horse at one racetrack shall provide on-track stalls on an equitable basis as determined by the commission under Section 2029.003.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS-BRED GREYHOUNDS

Sec. 2030.051. QUALIFICATIONS OF TEXAS-BRED GREYHOUNDS. (a) Subject to this subtitle or commission rule, the state greyhound breed registry shall adopt reasonable rules to establish the qualifications of accredited Texas-bred greyhounds to promote, develop, and improve the breeding of greyhounds in this state.

(b) Rules adopted under this section are subject to approval by the commission.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.052. STATE GREYHOUND BREED REGISTRY. The officially designated state greyhound breed registry for accredited Texas-bred greyhounds is the Texas Greyhound Association.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2030.053. BREAKAGE DISTRIBUTIONS DUE STATE GREYHOUND BREED REGISTRY. (a) The state greyhound breed registry shall adopt rules to provide for the use of breakage received by the registry under Section 2028.154(a).

(b) A racetrack association shall pay the appropriate state greyhound breed registry at least every 30 days the breakage due to the breed registry.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.